Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-290
Resignation of directors.

(MBCA 8.07) (a) A director
may resign at any time by delivering a written resignation to the board of
directors or its chairperson or to the secretary of the corporation.

(b) A resignation is
effective when the resignation is delivered unless the resignation specifies
a later effective date or an effective date determined upon the happening
of an event or events. A resignation that is conditioned upon failing to receive
a specified vote for election as a director may provide that it is irrevocable.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 90.